Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-604
Construction of rules.

The Nebraska Rules of the Road shall be so interpreted and construed as to effectuate their general purpose to make uniform the laws relating to motor vehicles.

Laws 1973, LB 45, § 121;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-6,121;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 100.

Sections 39-601 to 39-6,122 do not apply to the users of a hospital drive that does not fit the statutory definition of a "highway" found in section 39-602. However, common law rules applicable to users of public ways do apply. Bassinger v. Agnew, 206 Neb. 1, 290 N.W.2d 793 (1980) (pursuant to Laws 1993, LB 370, sections 97 to 470, language from sections 39-601 to 39-6,122 was placed in sections 60-601 to 60-6,374. Pursuant to Laws 1993, LB 370, section 120, "highway" is now defined in section 60-624).